Alaska statutes. Title 41. Public Resources.
Article 6. Alaska Chilkat Bald Eagle Preserve.

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska Chilkat Bald Eagle Preserve, see 11 AAC 21.

Sec. 41.21.610.
Purpose of AS 41.21.610 — 41.21.630.

The purpose of AS

41.21.610

—

41.21.630

is to establish the state-owned land and water described in AS

41.21.611(b)

as the Alaska Chilkat Bald Eagle Preserve as part of the state park system. The primary purpose for establishing the Alaska Chilkat Bald Eagle Preserve is to protect and perpetuate the Chilkat bald eagles and their essential habitats within the Alaska Chilkat Bald Eagle Preserve in recognition of their statewide, nationally, and internationally significant values in perpetuity.

The Alaska Chilkat Bald Eagle Preserve is also established to

protect and sustain the natural salmon spawning and rearing areas of the Chilkat River and Chilkoot River systems within the preserve in perpetuity;

provide continued opportunities for research, study, and enjoyment of bald eagles and other wildlife;

ensure to the maximum extent practicable water quality and necessary water quantity under applicable laws;

provide for other public uses consistent with the primary purpose for which the Alaska Chilkat Bald Eagle Preserve is established; and

provide an opportunity for the continued traditional and natural resource based lifestyle of the people living in the general areas described in AS

41.21.611(b)

, consistent with the other purposes of this subsection and (a) of this section.

It is the intent of the legislature in enacting AS

41.21.610

—

41.21.630

to provide sufficient protection for the purposes for which the Alaska Chilkat Bald Eagle Preserve is established. Accordingly, the establishment of the Alaska Chilkat Bald Eagle Preserve and the Haines State Forest Resource Management Area under AS

41.15.305

is determined to represent a proper balance between the reservation of state public domain land and water for bald eagle preserve purposes and state public domain land and water more appropriate for multiple use. Therefore, the legislature determines that there is no need for legislation expanding or contracting the boundary of the Alaska Chilkat Bald Eagle Preserve in the future; the legislature further determines that study by a state agency of the expansion or contracting of the boundary of the preserve shall be conducted under AS

41.21.621

.

Inasmuch as the area described in AS

41.21.611(b)

exceeds 640 acres, AS

41.21.610

—

41.21.630

are intended to close the area to multiple use in conformity with AS

38.05.300

and the land is dedicated as a special purpose site under art. VIII, § 7 of the state constitution.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.506. Renumbered in 1983.

Administrative Code. —

For Eagle preserve land and water restrictions, see 11 AAC 21, art. 1.

For preserve activities; management, see 11 AAC 21, art. 2.

Sec. 41.21.611.
Alaska Chilkat Bald Eagle Preserve established.

Subject to valid existing rights, the land and water presently owned by the state and all land and water acquired in the future by the state lying within the boundaries described in (b) of this section are designated the Alaska Chilkat Bald Eagle Preserve and assigned to the department for control, development, and maintenance.

Except for University of Alaska grant land, the land and water owned by the state and all land and water acquired by the state in the future lying within the following described parcels are designated as the Alaska Chilkat Bald Eagle Preserve:

Township 26 South, Range 55 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 26 South, Range 56 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 27 South, Range 55 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 28 South, Range 55 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 28 South, Range 56 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 28 South, Range 57 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 29 South, Range 55 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 29 South, Range 56 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 29 South, Range 57 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 29 South, Range 58 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 30 South, Range 57 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 30 South, Range 58 East, Copper River Meridian

Section 12: that portion within USS 3708

Section 13: that portion within USS 3708

Section 23: SE1/4NE1/4, NE1/4SE1/4, E1/2NW1/4SE1/4, S1/2SE1/4

Sections 24 and 25

Section 26: E1/2

Section 33: SE1/4SE1/4SE1/4

Section 34: E1/2NE1/4, E1/2SW1/4NE1/4, SE1/4NE1/4SW1/4, E1/2SW1/4SW1/4, SW1/4SW1/4SW1/4, SE1/4SW1/4, SE1/4

Section 35

Section 36: NE1/4NW1/4NE1/4, W1/2W1/2NE1/4, NW1/4, N1/2SW1/4, N1/2SW1/4SW1/4, SW1/4SW1/4SW1/4, NW1/4SE1/4SW1/4, NW1/4SE1/4;

Section 7: SW1/4NE1/4, that portion of the S1/2NW1/4 within USS 3708, S1/2

Section 8: SE1/4SW1/4NW1/4, SE1/4NW1/4, SW1/4, that portion of the S1/2NE1/4 within USS 3708

Section 17: W1/2NW1/4

Section 18

Section 19: W1/2, SW1/4SE1/4

Section 30: NE1/4NW1/4NE1/4, W1/2NW1/4NE1/4, NW1/4, W1/2SW1/4;

Section 2: NW1/4, W1/2NE1/4SW1/4, NW1/4SW1/4, N1/2SW1/4SW1/4, SW1/4SW1/4SW1/4, NW1/4SE1/4SW1/4, except USS 3744

Section 3

Section 4: NE1/4NE1/4NE1/4, S1/2NE1/4NE1/4, E1/2SW1/4NE1/4, SE1/4NE1/4, E1/2SE1/4SW1/4, SE1/4

Section 8: SE1/4SE1/4SW1/4, S1/2S1/2SE1/4, N1/2SE1/4SE1/4

Section 9: E1/2, E1/2NW1/4, N1/2NE1/4SW1/4, SE1/4NE1/4SW1/4, NW1/4SW1/4SW1/4, S1/2S1/2SW1/4

Section 10: W1/2W1/2NE1/4, W1/2

Section 15: NW1/4NW1/4NE1/4, S1/2NW1/4NE1/4, SW1/4NE1/4, W1/2, W1/2SE1/4

Section 16: E1/2, NW1/4, N1/2SW1/4, NW1/4SE1/4SW1/4, E1/2SE1/4SW1/4

Section 17: N1/2NE1/4, NE1/4SW1/4NE1/4, SE1/4NE1/4, E1/2NE1/4NW1/4, N1/2NE1/4SE1/4, SE1/4NE1/4SE1/4

Section 21: E1/2, E1/2E1/2NW1/4, SW1/4SE1/4NW1/4, E1/2SW1/4, SE1/4SW1/4SW1/4

Section 22: SW1/4NE1/4NE1/4, W1/2E1/2, W1/2SE1/4NE1/4, W1/2, W1/2E1/2SE1/4

Section 26: NW1/4NW1/4NW1/4, S1/2NW1/4NW1/4, SW1/4NW1/4, W1/2E1/2SW1/4, W1/2SW1/4

Section 27

Section 28: E1/2, E1/2W1/2, E1/2W1/2W1/2

Section 33: N1/2NE1/4, E1/2SW1/4NE1/4, NW1/4SW1/4NE1/4, SE1/4NE1/4, E1/2NE1/4NW1/4, NE1/4SE1/4, E1/2NW1/4SE1/4, N1/2SE1/4SE1/4, SE1/4SE1/4SE1/4

Section 34

Section 35: NW1/4NW1/4NE1/4, S1/2NW1/4NE1/4, SW1/4NE1/4, NW1/4SE1/4NE1/4, S1/2SE1/4NE1/4, W1/2, SE1/4

Section 36: W1/2SW1/4SW1/4;

Section 1: S1/2SW1/4NW1/4, SW1/4

Section 2

Section 3: NE1/4, N1/2NW1/4, N1/2SW1/4NW1/4, SE1/4NW1/4, NE1/4NE1/4SW1/4, N1/2SE1/4, SE1/4SE1/4

Section 4: E1/2NE1/4NE1/4

Section 10: that portion of Mosquito Lake within the NE1/4

Section 11: N1/2, N1/2SE1/4, NE1/4SW1/4SE1/4, SE1/4SE1/4, except USS 3431

Section 12

Section 13: E1/2, NE1/4NW1/4, E1/2NW1/4NW1/4, NW1/4NW1/4NW1/4, NW1/4SE1/4NW1/4, E1/2SE1/4NW1/4

Section 19: Lot 13

Section 24: E1/2E1/2, NE1/4NW1/4NE1/4

Section 25: except that portion north of the Haines Highway

Section 26: that portion south of the Haines Highway except Lots 2, 3, and the SW1/4SW1/4

Section 27: that portion south of the Haines Highway except S1/2S1/2

Section 28: except S1/2S1/2, the south 660 feet of Lots 5 — 7, and that portion north of the Haines Highway

Section 29: except S1/2S1/2S1/2, NE1/4SE1/4SE1/4, and Lots 9, 14, 15, and 18

Section 30: E1/2NE1/4, N1/2NE1/4SE1/4

Section 34: S1/2S1/2S1/2

Section 35: except NW1/4NE1/4, S1/2NE1/4, NW1/4, S1/2

Section 36: except SW1/4NW1/4, S1/2, and the south 660 feet of Lots 3 — 4;

Section 7: SW1/4NW1/4NW1/4, SW1/4NW1/4, SW1/4SE1/4NW1/4, W1/2NE1/4SW1/4, SE1/4NE1/4SW1/4, NW1/4SW1/4, S1/2SW1/4, SW1/4SW1/4SE1/4

Section 17: W1/2SW1/4SW1/4, SE1/4SW1/4SW1/4

Section 18: W1/2W1/2NE1/4, E1/2SW1/4NE1/4, SW1/4SE1/4NE1/4, W1/2, SE1/4

Section 19

Section 20: W1/2W1/2

Section 29: except USS 948, USS 991, Lots 1, 2, and 4 — 7, NE1/4, E1/2NW1/4

Section 30: except Lots 1, 4, 5, 8, 15-17, and the NE1/4SW1/4

Section 31

Section 32: except USS 991, USS 2455, and Lots 1, 2, and 24

Section 33: S1/2 except USS 2455 and Lots 18 — 21

Section 34: W1/2SW1/4SE1/4, SE1/4SW1/4SE1/4, SW1/4 except NE1/4SW1/4 and Lots 1 and 2;

Section 22: NE1/4SW1/4, E1/2SE1/4SW1/4, W1/2NW1/4SE1/4, SW1/4SE1/4, NW1/4SE1/4SE1/4, S1/2SE1/4SE1/4

Section 26: W1/2SW1/4NW1/4, W1/2W1/2SW1/4

Section 27: E1/2E1/2, N1/2NW1/4NE1/4, SE1/4NW1/4NE1/4

Section 34: NE1/4NE1/4, NE1/4SE1/4NE1/4

Section 35: SW1/4SW1/4NE1/4, NW1/4NW1/4NW1/4, S1/2NW1/4NW1/4, S1/2NW1/4, E1/2SW1/4, NW1/4NW1/4SE1/4, S1/2NW1/4SE1/4, S1/2SE1/4, SW1/4NE1/4SE1/4;

Section 1: S1/2NE1/4NE1/4, E1/2SW1/4NE1/4, N1/2SE1/4NE1/4, SW1/4SE1/4NE1/4, NW1/4NE1/4SE1/4, NE1/4NW1/4SE1/4;

Section 1

Section 2: N1/2NE1/4, E1/2SE1/4NE1/4, NE1/4NW1/4, E1/2NE1/4SE1/4, NE1/4SE1/4SE1/4

Section 4: W1/2NW1/4, W1/2SE1/4NW1/4, SE1/4SE1/4NW1/4, SW1/4, W1/2NW1/4SE1/4, SE1/4NW1/4SE1/4, SW1/4SE1/4, W1/2SE1/4SE1/4, SE1/4SE1/4SE1/4

Section 5: E1/2, N1/2NW1/4, SE1/4NE1/4SW1/4, E1/2SE1/4SW1/4

Section 6: N1/2N1/2NE1/4, NE1/4NW1/4, S1/2NW1/4NW1/4, N1/2SW1/4NW1/4, NW1/4SE1/4NW1/4

Section 8: except SW1/4SW1/4 and S1/2SE1/4SW1/4

Section 9

Section 10: S1/2S1/2NE1/4, SW1/4NE1/4NW1/4, NW1/4NW1/4, S1/2NW1/4, S1/2

Section 11: S1/2NE1/4, S1/2S1/2NW1/4, NE1/4SW1/4NW1/4, N1/2SE1/4NW1/4, S1/2

Sections 12 — 14

Section 15: N1/2, N1/2N1/2SW1/4, E1/2SE1/4, NW1/4SE1/4, E1/2SW1/4SE1/4

Section 16: E1/2NE1/4, E1/2W1/2NE1/4, W1/2NW1/4NE1/4, NW1/4SW1/4NE1/4, N1/2N1/2NW1/4, SE1/4NE1/4NW1/4, NE1/4SE1/4NW1/4

Section 17: N1/2NE1/4NE1/4

Section 22: N1/2NE1/4NE1/4, NE1/4NW1/4NE1/4

Section 23: that portion of the N1/2NW1/4 lying west of Chilkat Lake;

Section 4: NW1/4NW1/4SW1/4, S1/2NW1/4SW1/4, SW1/4SW1/4, NW1/4SE1/4SW1/4, S1/2SE1/4SW1/4

Section 5: except Lots 2 — 4, N1/2NE1/4, NE1/4SE1/4NE1/4

Section 6: except Lots 1 and 9

Sections 7 and 8

USS 907

Section 9: W1/2W1/2NE1/4, SE1/4SW1/4NE1/4, SW1/4SE1/4NE1/4, NW1/4, S1/2

Section 10: Lots 1 — 4, W1/2NE1/4SW1/4, NW1/4SE1/4SW1/4, E1/2SW1/4SE1/4SW1/4

Section 14: that portion west of the Haines Highway

Section 15: except NE1/4NE1/4 and Lots 7 — 10, 13 — 14

Sections 16 — 18

USS 786

Section 19: NE1/4NE1/4NE1/4

Section 20: NE1/4, E1/2NW1/4, NW1/4NW1/4, E1/2SW1/4NW1/4, NE1/4SE1/4, N1/2NW1/4SE1/4, SE1/4NW1/4SE1/4, NE1/4SE1/4SE1/4

Sections 21 and 22

Section 23: that portion west of the Haines Highway

Section 25: that portion west of the Haines Highway

Section 26: that portion west of the Haines Highway

Section 28: NE1/4, NE1/4NW1/4, N1/2NW1/4NW1/4, N1/2SE1/4NW1/4, NE1/4SE1/4, N1/2NW1/4SE1/4, SE1/4NW1/4SE1/4, NE1/4SE1/4SE1/4

Section 34: NE1/4, NE1/4NW1/4, NE1/4SE1/4NW1/4, NE1/4SE1/4, NE1/4NW1/4SE1/4, E1/2SE1/4SE1/4

Section 36: that portion west of the Haines Highway;

Section 3: S1/2SW1/4NW1/4, SW1/4NE1/4SW1/4, W1/2SW1/4, SE1/4SW1/4, S1/2SW1/4SE1/4

Section 4: SW1/4NE1/4NE1/4, W1/2NE1/4, SE1/4NE1/4, NW1/4, NE1/4SW1/4, SE1/4

Section 9: NE1/4NE1/4

Section 10: N1/2, E1/2SW1/4, E1/2W1/2SW1/4, NW1/4NW1/4SW1/4, SE1/4

Section 31: that portion south of the Haines Highway;

Section 1

Section 2: NE1/4, NE1/4NW1/4, N1/2NW1/4NW1/4, SE1/4NW1/4NW1/4, N1/2SE1/4NW1/4, SE1/4SE1/4NW1/4, N1/2SE1/4, N1/2SE1/4SE1/4

Section 3: NE1/4NE1/4NE1/4

Section 12: NE1/4, NE1/4NW1/4, NE1/4NW1/4NW1/4, NE1/4SE1/4NW1/4, W1/2NE1/4SE1/4, NE1/4NW1/4SE1/4, E1/2E1/2SE1/4, NW1/4SE1/4SE1/4;

Section 6: that portion west of the Haines Highway

Section 7: that portion west of the Haines Highway

Section 8: that portion west of the Haines Highway

Section 16: that portion west of the Haines Highway

Section 17: that portion west of the Haines Highway

Section 18: Lots 1 — 3 and 5, SW1/4NE1/4, N1/2SE1/4NW1/4, SE1/4SE1/4NW1/4, SE1/4.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1982; am §§ 55 — 62 ch 37 SLA 1986)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly
AS 41.20.507(a) and (k). Renumbered in 1983.

Cross references. —

For provisions relating to certain transfers of land affecting the Alaska Chilkat Bald Eagle Preserve, see ch. 14, SLA 2000 in the 2000 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 41.21.612.
Land excluded.

Private land, approved or pending Native allotments, pending and approved land selections made by the Haines Borough under state law on July 1, 1982, University of Alaska grant land not located within the Chilkat River Critical Habitat Area established by AS

16.20.585

, and existing transportation and utility corridors located partially or completely within the Alaska Chilkat Bald Eagle Preserve are excluded from the Alaska Chilkat Bald Eagle Preserve.

University of Alaska grant land located within the boundary of the Chilkat River Critical Habitat Area established under AS

16.20.585

is excluded from the Alaska Chilkat Bald Eagle Preserve.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (a) was formerly the first sentence of AS 41.20.507(b).
Subsection (b) was formerly AS 41.20.507(n). Reorganized and renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 41.21.613.
Eminent domain prohibited.

The commissioner may not acquire private land or University of Alaska grant land located partially or completely within the Alaska Chilkat Bald Eagle Preserve by eminent domain for any purpose.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly the last sentence of AS 41.20.507(b). Reorganized and renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 41.21.614.
Native allotments.

Approved or pending Native allotments located partially or completely within the Alaska Chilkat Bald Eagle Preserve are not adversely affected by the establishment of the Alaska Chilkat Bald Eagle Preserve and all approved allotments and all pending allotments located partially or completely within the preserve shall be treated as private land.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.507(c). Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 41.21.615.
Fish and game management.

The Department of Fish and Game is responsible for the management of fish and game resources in the Alaska Chilkat Bald Eagle Preserve

under applicable law and consistent with the purposes of AS

41.21.610

—

41.21.630

;

subject to the authority of the Secretary of the Interior to permit the taking of bald eagles for the religious purposes of an Indian tribe under 16 U.S.C. 668a (§ 2, Bald Eagle Protection Act).

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.507(d). Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 41.21.616.
Regulations.

The department shall consult with the Department of Fish and Game, the United States Fish and Wildlife Service, a local governing body of a municipality, any local fish and game advisory committees, and the Alaska Chilkat Bald Eagle Preserve Advisory Council established by AS

41.21.625

before adoption of reasonable regulations governing public use and protection of the Alaska Chilkat Bald Eagle Preserve. The Department of Fish and Game shall consult with the department and the Alaska Chilkat Bald Eagle Preserve Advisory Council in proposing regulations governing fish and game management in the Alaska Chilkat Bald Eagle Preserve for adoption by the Board of Fisheries or the Board of Game.
The Department of Fish and Game and the department shall cooperate with the United States Fish and Wildlife Service in its administration of federal law governing the conservation of bald eagles.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.507(e). Renumbered in 1983.

Administrative Code. —

For Eagle preserve land and water restrictions, see 11 AAC 21, art. 1.

For preserve activities; management, see 11 AAC 21, art. 2.

Sec. 41.21.617.
Other uses generally.

The state land and water described in AS

41.21.611(b)

is closed to mineral entry under AS

38.05.135

—

38.05.275

, to commercial harvest of timber, and to sale under state land disposal laws. The commissioner may lease the land described in AS

41.21.611(b)

under AS

38.05.070

—

38.05.105

for a purpose consistent with AS

41.21.610(a)

and (b). A municipality may select land within the Alaska Chilkat Bald Eagle Preserve under law.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.507(f). Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 41.21.618.
Traditional uses.

Continued opportunities for traditional uses of the Alaska Chilkat Bald Eagle Preserve at levels and by methods and means that are compatible with the protection of the bald eagle population are guaranteed.
These historically compatible uses include but are not limited to hunting, trapping, fishing, berry picking, other subsistence and recreational uses, operation of motorized vehicles, and the harvesting of personal-use firewood.
The level and method or means of traditional use may continue subject to reasonable regulation unless the director of the division of parks of the department, after consultation with the Alaska Chilkat Bald Eagle Preserve Advisory Council, makes a finding that the level or method and means of use is causing significant resource damage that is inconsistent with AS

41.21.610(a)

and (b).
The director of the division of parks shall hold a public hearing in Haines and Klukwan before restricting a traditional use permitted under this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.507(g). Renumbered in 1983.

Administrative Code. —

For Eagle preserve land and water restrictions, see 11 AAC 21, art. 1.

For preserve activities; management, see 11 AAC 21, art. 2.

Sec. 41.21.619.
Access and rights-of-way.

If privately owned land, University of Alaska grant land, a valid mining right, an existing mineral lease, a subsurface right on private land, or other valid occupancy is surrounded by state land of the Alaska Chilkat Bald Eagle Preserve or if privately owned land, University of Alaska grant land, federal land, municipal land, or state land not described in AS

41.21.611(b)

, a valid mining claim, subsurface right, or other valid occupancy on land not described in AS

41.21.611(b)

does not have reasonable, timely, and economically feasible access and egress by means other than crossing land designated as Alaska Chilkat Bald Eagle Preserve land in AS 41.21.611(b), the director of the division of parks shall grant a private landowner, the University of Alaska, a holder of a valid existing right to land, or a state agency, municipality, or federal agency the rights necessary to assure reasonable, timely, and economically feasible access and egress. A permittee or licensee of an owner of land or the holder of a valid existing right to land may use access and egress granted under this subsection.
The rights of access and egress granted under this subsection are subject to reasonable regulation and stipulations established by the director of the division of parks after consulting with the Alaska Chilkat Bald Eagle Preserve Advisory Council to protect the purposes and values of the Alaska Chilkat Bald Eagle Preserve and to minimize adverse environmental impacts in the preserve.
As used in this subsection, “valid existing right” includes but is not limited to a valid mining right, an existing mineral right, and a subsurface right.
The director of the division of parks shall give favorable consideration to applications for utility rights-of-way that are compatible with AS

41.21.610(a)

and (b).

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.507(h). Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 41.21.620.
Management plan.

The director of the division of parks and the Alaska Chilkat Bald Eagle Advisory Council established under AS

41.21.625

, in written consultation with the United States Fish and Wildlife Service, the Department of Fish and Game, the Chilkat Indian Village, the Chilkoot Indian Association, and other appropriate groups, may use information gained through cooperative resource studies in the development of the management plan for the Alaska Chilkat Bald Eagle Preserve and in decisions affecting the management and administration of the preserve. The director of the division of parks and the advisory council shall investigate the need for additional research to increase the knowledge and understanding of the natural and cultural resources of the area and to enhance the effective management of the Alaska Chilkat Bald Eagle Preserve.

The director of the division of parks and the director of the division of forestry shall consult in the preparation of the management plan prepared under (a) of this section to promote effective, efficient, and coordinated administration of the Haines State Forest Resource Management Area and the Alaska Chilkat Bald Eagle Preserve for the purposes and values for which each is established.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.507(i) and (m). Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 41.21.621.
Additions or deletions to preserve.

An agency of the state may not participate or cooperate with a federal or private study considering additions to or deletions from the area of the Alaska Chilkat Bald Eagle Preserve without giving 90 days’ prior notice to the Alaska Chilkat Bald Eagle Preserve Advisory Council.
The director of the division of parks may waive the notice required by this subsection on the director’s determination in writing to the advisory council that an emergency necessitates immediate study or a shorter period of notice to the advisory council.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.507(j). Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 41.21.622.
Historical, cultural and burial sites.

Historical, cultural, and burial sites identified in the Alaska Chilkat Bald Eagle Preserve management plan are not available for surface disposal under AS

41.21.617

and shall be managed by the director of the division of parks to prevent vandalism, destruction, and desecration.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.507(

l

). Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 41.21.625.
Alaska Chilkat Bald Eagle Preserve Advisory Council.

A 12-member Alaska Chilkat Bald Eagle Preserve Advisory Council is established. The members of the advisory council shall be selected under this section.

The governor shall appoint individuals to the Alaska Chilkat Bald Eagle Preserve Advisory Council representing the following interests for a two-year term:

a resident of the Haines Borough representing a conservation organization;

a representative of the United States Fish and Wildlife Service; and

a member of the Upper Lynn Canal fish and game advisory committee.

The mayor of the Haines Borough, the president of Klukwan, Inc., the chair of the Council of the Chilkat Indian Village, and the chair of the Chilkoot Indian Association are ex officio members of the Alaska Chilkat Bald Eagle Preserve Advisory Council. A member of the Haines Borough Assembly who has been selected by the Haines Borough Assembly is also an ex officio member of the advisory council. For this selection, preference shall be given to those members of the Haines Borough Assembly who do not also sit on boards that are already represented on the advisory council. The mayor of the Haines Borough may recommend to the governor for appointment to the advisory council the name of a resident of the Haines Borough for the representation of commercial or industrial interests.

The commissioner of fish and game, the director of the division of parks, and the director of the division of forestry, or their designees, serve ex officio as members of the Alaska Chilkat Bald Eagle Preserve Advisory Council.

The Alaska Chilkat Bald Eagle Preserve Advisory Council shall assist the department in the development and monitoring of a management plan for the Alaska Chilkat Bald Eagle Preserve. The management plan shall be presented at public hearings in Haines and Klukwan before approval and implementation by the department.

Members of the Alaska Chilkat Bald Eagle Preserve Advisory Council selected under (b) — (d) of this section may select alternates to act as members of the advisory council in their absence.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1982; am § 1 ch 94 SLA 2006)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.515. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 41.21.630.
Existing rights.

The establishment of the Alaska Chilkat Bald Eagle Preserve under AS

41.21.610

—

41.21.630

does not enlarge, diminish, add to, or waive a requirement of law otherwise applicable to the management or use of the state land of the Haines State Forest Resource Management Area (AS

41.15.300

—

41.15.330

) or private land.
An activity allowed under law on land not described in AS

41.21.611(b)

, including but not limited to an activity described in AS

41.21.618

, timber harvest, mining, resource development, and recreation, is permitted so long as the activity is conducted in compliance with law.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.525. Renumbered in 1983.